Utah statutes.
41-1a-604.   Filing effective to give notice of liens.

The filing and the issuance of a new certificate of title under Sections 41-1a-602 and 41-1a-603 constitute constructive notice of all liens and encumbrances against the vehicle, vessel, and outboard motor to creditors of the owner, to a person financing the inventory of a motor vehicle dealer that sells or offers the vehicle for sale, and to subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers.



Amended by Chapter 342, 2010 General Session

